Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.160

Jefferson county.

Jefferson county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Commencing at the middle of the channel of Admiralty Inlet due north of Point Wilson; thence westerly along the Strait of Juan de Fuca to the north of Protection Island, to a point opposite the middle of the channel between Protection Island and Diamond Point on the west of Port Discovery Bay; thence following up the middle of said channel to a point direct east of the mouth of Eagle creek; thence west to the mouth of Eagle creek; thence one mile west from the mouth of said creek; thence south to the summit of the Olympic range of mountains, it being the southeast corner of Clallam county, on the north boundary line of township twenty-seven north, range two west; thence west to the west boundary of the state in the Pacific Ocean; thence southerly along said west boundary to a point opposite the mouth of the Queets river; thence east to the range line dividing ranges six and seven west; thence north on said range line to the sixth standard parallel; thence east to the middle of the channel of Hood Canal; thence northerly along said channel to the middle of the channel of Admiralty Inlet; thence northerly following the channel of said inlet to a point due north of Point Wilson and place of beginning.

[(i) 1 H.C. s12; 1877 p 406 s 1; 1869 p 292 s 1; RRS s 3940. (ii) 1925 ex.s. c 40 s 1; RRS s 3963-1.]